Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-110
City council; supplemental powers; authorized.

If the manner of exercising any power conferred upon the city council of a city of the metropolitan class is not prescribed, the city council may provide by ordinance for the exercise of such power.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. I, § 10, p. 409;

C.S.1922, § 3947;

C.S.1929, § 14-110;

R.S.1943, § 14-110;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 19.
July 21, 2022
Right to levy taxes having been conferred on municipal authorities, they have power to supply the details necessary to full exercise of such right. Chicago & N. W. Ry. Co. v. Bauman, 132 Neb. 67, 271 N.W. 256 (1937).

This section does not deprive State Railway Commission of jurisdiction to control operation of taxicab companies in city of Omaha. In re Yellow Cab & Baggage Co., 126 Neb. 138, 253 N.W. 80 (1934).

City may provide for notice to property owners of a hearing of claims for damages arising from grading of a street. Burkley v. City of Omaha, 102 Neb. 308, 167 N.W. 72 (1918).

In absence of constitutional or statutory restrictions upon its power, city may prescribe by ordinance means of acquiring jurisdiction of a certain subject. Ives v. Irey, 51 Neb. 136, 70 N.W. 961 (1897).

City has only such powers as are expressly conferred upon it by statute, or as are necessary to carry into effect some enumerated power. State ex rel. Ransom v. Irey, 42 Neb. 186, 60 N.W. 601 (1894).